Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.801

Development of policies, procedures, and rules—2021 c 323.

The commission must develop policies, procedures, and rules to ensure that the goals of chapter 323, Laws of 2021 are fully implemented as intended and in a timely manner, and to provide appropriate clarity to affected persons and entities as to how the commission will process complaints, investigations, and hearings, and impose sanctions, related to officer decertification. The commission must work in collaboration with interested parties and entities in developing the policies, procedures, and rules, and must take into account issues regarding when and how the commission may appropriately exercise authority in relation to simultaneous investigations and disciplinary processes, and how the commission may exercise available remedies in a manner that is appropriate to case circumstances and consistent with the goals of chapter 323, Laws of 2021. The policies, procedures, and rules must be completed by June 30, 2022.

[ 2021 c 323 s 22.]